Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB436.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5555 of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 5555. Prohibition of ownership.(a) Ownership.--Notwithstanding any provision of law and in addition to any other penalty provided by law, the authority imposing sentence upon a conviction for a violation of this subchapter [may] shall order the prohibition [or limitation] of the defendant's ownership, possession, control or custody of animals or employment with the care of animals for a period of [time not to exceed the statutory maximum term of imprisonment applicable to the offense for which sentence is being imposed] no less than two years. A humane society police officer, law 123456789101112131415161718 enforcement officer or State dog warden shall have authority to ensure compliance with this section and may notify the local district attorney who may petition the court to remove animals kept in violation of this section.(b) Violence prevention counseling required.--(1) An order issued under subsection (a) shall require the defendant to attend and complete violence prevention counseling, which attendance and completion must be proven to the authority imposing the sentence through a signed and dated written acknowledgment.(2) For a second or subsequent violation of this subchapter, the authority imposing the sentence shall require further violence prevention counseling, which must be satisfactorily completed and documented each time and provided to the authority imposing the sentence.(c) Offense defined.--An individual subject to this section commits an offense if the individual:(1) Fails to attend and complete violence prevention counseling as ordered by the authority imposing the sentence.(2) Possesses, owns, controls, has custody of or is employed with the care of an animal while the order remains in effect.(d) Grading.--(1) A violation of subsection (c)(2) shall constitute a misdemeanor of the third degree and, upon conviction, shall result in a prohibition extension of at least one year.(2) A second violation of subsection (c)(2) shall constitute a misdemeanor of the second degree and, upon conviction, shall result in a prohibition extension of at least five years.20250HB0436PN0408 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) A third or subsequent violation of subsection (c)(2) shall constitute a misdemeanor of the first degree and, upon conviction, shall result in a prohibition extension of at least 10 years.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0436PN0408 - 3 - 12345